Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB172.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 65-122 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
122. No A person afflicted with an infectious or contagious disease
dangerous to the public health shall not be admitted into any public,
parochial or private school or licensed child care facility. It shall be the
duty of the parent or guardian, and the principal or other person in charge
of any public, parochial, private school or licensed child care facility to
exclude therefrom any child or other person affected with a disease that is
suspected of being infectious or contagious until the expiration of the
prescribed period of isolation or quarantine for the particular infectious or
contagious disease. If the attending person licensed to practice medicine
and surgery a physician or local health officer finds upon examination that
the person affected with a disease, that is suspected of being infectious or
contagious is not suffering from an infectious or contagious disease, he or
she such physician may submit a certificate to this effect to the person in
charge of the public, parochial, private school or licensed child care
facility and such person shall be readmitted to school or to the child care
facility.
(b) A person who has been exposed or potentially exposed to an
infectious or contagious disease shall not be excluded from a public,
parochial or private school or licensed child care facility due to such
exposure or potential exposure unless the local health office or secretary
has issued an order to such person requiring isolation or quarantine
pursuant to K.S.A. 65-129c, and amendments thereto. Any exclusion from
school due to exposure or potential exposure to an infectious or
contagious disease shall not be longer than the period of isolation or
quarantine specified in such order.
(c) As used in this section, "physician" means a person licensed to
practice medicine and surgery by the state board of healing arts.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 65-122 is hereby repealed.

SB 172 2
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.